trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic.aff
FLAG num
SFX 440 Y 5
SFX 440 0 wnk/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 440 0 wnk/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 440 0 wnkmA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 440 0 wnkm/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 440 0 wnkn/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 55 Y 2
SFX 55 0 0/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~n
SFX 55 0 A/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~n
SFX 145 Y 6
SFX 145 0 0/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 145 0 0/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 145 0 0/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 145 0 mA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 145 0 m/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 145 0 n/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 579 Y 2
SFX 579 0 ny/2,1027 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 579 0 nA/2,1027 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 59 Y 6
SFX 59 0 0/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 59 0 0/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 59 0 0/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 59 0 mA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 59 0 m/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 59 0 n/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~t
SFX 124 Y 11
SFX 124 0 h/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 hmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 hm/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 hA/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 hn/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 k/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 k/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 kmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 km/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 kn/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 124 0 nA/2,1001 . +NSuff-h
SFX 244 Y 12
SFX 244 0 th/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 thmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 thm/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 thA/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 thn/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 tk/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 tk/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 tkmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 tkm/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 tkn/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 ty/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 244 0 tnA/2,1004 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 0/2,1001 . +CVSuff-o
SFX 143 Y 22
SFX 143 0 h/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 hmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 hm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 hA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 hn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 k/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 k/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 kmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 km/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 kn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 ny/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 nA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 Ah/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 AhmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 Ahm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 AhA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 Ahn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 Ak/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 Ak/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 AkmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 Akm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 143 0 Akn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 0 0/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 y/2,1001 . +CVSuff-y
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 0 yn/2,1007 . +NSuff-iyna
SFX 149 Y 12
SFX 149 0 wh/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 whmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 whm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 whA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 whn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 wk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 wk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 wkmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 wkm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 wkn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 wny/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 149 0 wnA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 p/2,1006 . +NSuff-ap
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 0 A/2,1047 . +IVSuff-A
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 0/2,1018 . +Suff-0
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 An/2,1006 . +NSuff-An
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 0 0/2,1055 . +Suff-0
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 At/2,1006 . +NSuff-At
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 wA/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wA
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 tyn/2,1002 . +NSuff-tayn
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 0 wA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awA
SFX 228 Y 13
SFX 228 0 ty/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tyh/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tyhmA/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tyhm/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tyhA/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tyhn/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tyk/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tyk/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tykmA/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tykm/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tykn/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 ty/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 228 0 tynA/2,1002 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 246 Y 13
SFX 246 0 w/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 wh/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 whmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 whm/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 whA/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 whn/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 wk/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 wk/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 wkmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 wkm/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 wkn/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 y/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 246 0 wnA/2,1004 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 408 Y 7
SFX 408 0 h/2,1044 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 408 0 hmA/2,1044 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 408 0 hm/2,1044 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 408 0 hA/2,1044 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 408 0 hn/2,1044 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 408 0 ny/2,1044 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 408 0 nA/2,1044 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 254 Y 12
SFX 254 0 Ath/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 AthmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 Athm/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 AthA/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 Athn/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 Atk/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 Atk/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 AtkmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 Atkm/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 Atkn/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 Aty/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 254 0 AtnA/2,1003 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 wA/2,1001 . +CVSuff-wA
SFX 400 Y 7
SFX 400 0 Anh/2,1031 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 400 0 AnhmA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 400 0 Anhm/2,1031 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 400 0 AnhA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 400 0 Anhn/2,1031 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 400 0 Anny/2,1031 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 400 0 AnnA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 wn/2,1004 . +NSuff-wn
SFX 392 Y 7
SFX 392 0 Anh/2,1030 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 392 0 AnhmA/2,1030 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 392 0 Anhm/2,1030 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 392 0 AnhA/2,1030 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 392 0 Anhn/2,1030 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 392 0 Anny/2,1030 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 392 0 AnnA/2,1030 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 0 y/2,1000 . +FWSuff-iy-me
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 0 0/2,1026 . +Suff-0
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 0 p/2,1009 . +NSuff-ap
SFX 484 Y 7
SFX 484 0 h/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 484 0 hmA/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 484 0 hm/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 484 0 hA/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 484 0 hn/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 484 0 ny/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 484 0 nA/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 485 Y 5
SFX 485 0 k/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 485 0 k/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 485 0 kmA/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 485 0 km/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 485 0 kn/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 0 wA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awA
SFX 435 Y 1
SFX 435 0 wA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awA
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 0 n/2,1033 . +IVSuff-|n
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 At/2,1009 . +NSuff-At
SFX 454 Y 7
SFX 454 0 wh/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 454 0 whmA/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 454 0 whm/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 454 0 whA/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 454 0 whn/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 454 0 wny/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 454 0 wnA/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 67 Y 12
SFX 67 0 h/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 hmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 hm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 hA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 hn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 k/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 k/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 kmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 km/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 kn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 ny/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 67 0 nA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 455 Y 5
SFX 455 0 wk/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 455 0 wk/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 455 0 wkmA/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 455 0 wkm/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 455 0 wkn/2,1022 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 65 Y 12
SFX 65 0 wh/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 whmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 whm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 whA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 whn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 wk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 wk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 wkmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 wkm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 wkn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 wny/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 65 0 wnA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 160 Y 5
SFX 160 0 h/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 160 0 hmA/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 160 0 hm/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 160 0 hA/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 160 0 hn/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 0 0/2,1047 . +IVSuff-|
SFX 159 Y 7
SFX 159 0 wh/2,1001 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 159 0 whmA/2,1001 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 159 0 whm/2,1001 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 159 0 whA/2,1001 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 159 0 whn/2,1001 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 159 0 wny/2,1001 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 159 0 wnA/2,1001 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 155 Y 7
SFX 155 0 h/2,1001 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 155 0 hmA/2,1001 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 155 0 hm/2,1001 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 155 0 hA/2,1001 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 155 0 hn/2,1001 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 155 0 ny/2,1001 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 155 0 nA/2,1001 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 A/2,1000 . +FWSuff-A
SFX 517 Y 7
SFX 517 0 h/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 517 0 hmA/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 517 0 hm/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 517 0 hA/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 517 0 hn/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 517 0 ny/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 517 0 nA/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 518 Y 5
SFX 518 0 k/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 518 0 k/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 518 0 kmA/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 518 0 km/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 518 0 kn/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 428 Y 7
SFX 428 0 h/2,1053 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 428 0 hmA/2,1053 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 428 0 hm/2,1053 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 428 0 hA/2,1053 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 428 0 hn/2,1053 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 428 0 ny/2,1053 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 428 0 nA/2,1053 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 0 0/2,1009 . +Suff-0
SFX 424 Y 7
SFX 424 0 h/2,1052 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 424 0 hmA/2,1052 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 424 0 hm/2,1052 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 424 0 hA/2,1052 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 424 0 hn/2,1052 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 424 0 ny/2,1052 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 424 0 nA/2,1052 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 213 Y 12
SFX 213 0 Ath/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 AthmA/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 Athm/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 AthA/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 Athn/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 Atk/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 Atk/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 AtkmA/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 Atkm/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 Atkn/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 Aty/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 213 0 AtnA/2,1002 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 A/2,1000 . +PVSuff-A
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 yn/2,1007 . +NSuff-ayn
SFX 448 Y 7
SFX 448 0 wh/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 448 0 whmA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 448 0 whm/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 448 0 whA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 448 0 whn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 448 0 wny/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 448 0 wnA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 0 A/2,1001 . +NSuff-AF
SFX 436 Y 7
SFX 436 0 wh/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 436 0 whmA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 436 0 whm/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 436 0 whA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 436 0 whn/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 436 0 wny/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 436 0 wnA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 449 Y 5
SFX 449 0 wk/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 449 0 wk/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 449 0 wkmA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 449 0 wkm/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 449 0 wkn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 y/2,1001 . +FWSuff-~iy
SFX 437 Y 5
SFX 437 0 wk/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 437 0 wk/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 437 0 wkmA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 437 0 wkm/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 437 0 wkn/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 0 wn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awn
SFX 36 Y 13
SFX 36 0 y/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 yh/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 yhmA/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 yhm/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 yhA/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 yhn/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 yk/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 yk/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 ykmA/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 ykm/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 ykn/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 y/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 36 0 ynA/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 589 Y 5
SFX 589 0 h/2,1060 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 589 0 hmA/2,1060 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 589 0 hm/2,1060 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 589 0 hA/2,1060 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 589 0 hn/2,1060 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 438 Y 1
SFX 438 0 wn/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awn
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 wA/2,1050 . +IVSuff-wA
SFX 590 Y 5
SFX 590 0 k/2,1060 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 590 0 k/2,1060 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 590 0 kmA/2,1060 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 590 0 km/2,1060 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 590 0 kn/2,1060 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 505 Y 7
SFX 505 0 Anh/2,1013 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 505 0 AnhmA/2,1013 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 505 0 Anhm/2,1013 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 505 0 AnhA/2,1013 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 505 0 Anhn/2,1013 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 505 0 Anny/2,1013 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 505 0 AnnA/2,1013 . +IVSuff-Anh
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 yn/2,1000 . +NSuff-ayn
